Missouri, session 2026, SB1724.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 195.017, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 195.017,
3 to read as follows:
1 195.017. 1. The department of health and senior
2 services shall place a substance in Schedule I if it finds
3 that the substance:
4 (1) Has high potential for abuse; and
5 (2) Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the
6 United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment
7 under medical supervision.
8 2. Schedule I:
9 (1) The controlled substances listed in this
10 subsection are included in Schedule I;
11 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their
12 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
13 esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever
14 the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is
15 possible within the specific chemical designation:
16 (a) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(1-methyl-2-
17 phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylacetamide);
18 (b) Acetylmethadol;

SB 1724 2
19 (c) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
20 phenylacetamide);
21 (d) Acryl fentanyl (-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
22 phenylacrylamide);
23 (e) AH-7921(3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino)
24 cyclohexylmethyl] benzamide);
25 (f) Allylprodine;
26 (g) Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol,
27 also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol levothadyl acetate
28 or LAAM);
29 (h) Alphameprodine;
30 (i) Alphamethadol;
31 (j) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-1-(alphamethyl-beta-
32 phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl) propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-
33 phenylethyl)-4 ((N-propanilido) piperidine);
34 (k) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-(1-methyl-2-(2-
35 thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
36 (l) Benzethidine;
37 (m) Betacetylmethadol;
38 (n) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-
39 4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
40 (o) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-
41 phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
42 (p) Betameprodine;
43 (q) Betamethadol;
44 (r) Betaprodine;
45 (s) Clonitazene;
46 (t) Dextromoramide;
47 (u) Diampromide;
48 (v) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;
49 (w) Diethylthiambutene;
50 (x) Difenoxin;

SB 1724 3
51 (y) Dimenoxadol;
52 (z) Dimepheptanol;
53 (aa) Dimethylthiambutene;
54 (bb) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
55 (cc) Dipipanone;
56 (dd) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
57 (ee) Etonitazene;
58 (ff) Etoxeridine;
59 (gg) 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl -(4-fluorophenyl)-N-
60 (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide;
61 (hh) Furanyl fentanyl -(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
62 phenylfuran-2-carboxamide;
63 (ii) Furethidine;
64 (jj) Hydroxypethidine;
65 (kk) Ketobemidone;
66 (ll) Levomoramide;
67 (mm) Levophenacylmorphan;
68 (nn) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-(3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-
69 piperidyl)-N-phenylproanamide), its optical and geometric
70 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
71 (oo) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-((3-methyl-1-(2-
72 thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
73 (pp) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-
74 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
75 (qq) Morpheridine;
76 (rr) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
77 (ss) MT-45(1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)
78 piperazine);
79 (tt) Noracymethadol;
80 (uu) Norlevorphanol;
81 (vv) Normethadone;
82 (ww) Norpipanone;

SB 1724 4
83 (xx) Ocfentanil N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-
84 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide;
85 (yy) Ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-2-(1-phenethylpiperidin-
86 yl)propionamide); other name 2-fluorofentanyl;
87 (zz) para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-4-fluorophenyl)-N-
88 (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide;
89 (aaa) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-(2-
90 phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl) propanamide;
91 (bbb) PEPAP (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-
92 acetoxypiperidine);
93 (ccc) Phenadoxone;
94 (ddd) Phenampromide;
95 (eee) Phenomorphan;
96 (fff) Phenoperidine;
97 (ggg) Piritramide;
98 (hhh) Proheptazine;
99 (iii) Properidine;
100 (jjj) Propiram;
101 (kkk) Racemoramide;
102 (lll) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-
103 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-
104 carboxamide);
105 (mmm) Thiofentanyl (-phenyl-N-(1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
106 piperidinyl)-propanamide;
107 (nnn) Tilidine;
108 (ooo) Trimeperidine;
109 (3) Any of the following opium derivatives, their
110 salts, isomers and salts of isomers unless specifically
111 excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and
112 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
113 designation:
114 (a) Acetorphine;

SB 1724 5
115 (b) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
116 (c) Benzylmorphine;
117 (d) Codeine methylbromide;
118 (e) Codeine-N-Oxide;
119 (f) Cyprenorphine;
120 (g) Desomorphine;
121 (h) Dihydromorphine;
122 (i) Drotebanol;
123 (j) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
124 (k) Heroin;
125 (l) Hydromorphinol;
126 (m) Methyldesorphine;
127 (n) Methyldihydromorphine;
128 (o) Morphine methylbromide;
129 (p) Morphine methylsulfonate;
130 (q) Morphine-N-Oxide;
131 (r) Myrophine;
132 (s) Nicocodeine;
133 (t) Nicomorphine;
134 (u) Normorphine;
135 (v) Pholcodine;
136 (w) Thebacon;
137 (4) Any of the following opiate similar synthetic
138 substances scheduled by the U.S. Drug Enforcement
139 Administration as substances that share a pharmacological
140 profile similar to fentanyl, morphine, and other synthetic
141 opioids, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
142 another schedule:
143 (a) Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
144 phenylbutyramide);
145 (b) U-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)
146 cyclohexyl]--methyl benzamide).

SB 1724 6
147 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
148 which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
149 substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers,
150 unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
151 these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
152 within the specific chemical designation:
153 (a) Alpha-ethyltryptamine;
154 (b) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
155 (c) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
156 (d) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
157 (e) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine;
158 (f) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine;
159 (g) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl) ethanamine;
160 (h) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl) ethanamine;
161 (i) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl) ethanamine;
162 (j) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl) ethanamine;
163 (k) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
164 (l) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
165 (m) 2-(4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
166 (n) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
167 (o) 2-(4-Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)
168 ethanamine;
169 (p) 4-methoxyamphetamine;
170 (q) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
171 (r) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
172 (s) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
173 (t) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
174 (u) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine;
175 (v) N-hydroxy-3, 4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
176 (w) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine;
177 (x) 5-MeO-DMT or 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine;
178 (y) Alpha-methyltryptamine;

SB 1724 7
179 (z) Bufotenine;
180 (aa) Diethyltryptamine;
181 (bb) Dimethyltryptamine;
182 (cc) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;
183 (dd) Ibogaine;
184 (ee) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
185 (ff) Marijuana or marihuana, except industrial hemp;
186 (gg) Mescaline;
187 (hh) Parahexyl;
188 (ii) Peyote, to include all parts of the plant
189 presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii
190 Lemaire, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any
191 extract from any part of such plant; and every compound,
192 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the
193 plant, its seed or extracts;
194 (jj) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
195 (kk) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
196 (ll) Psilocybin;
197 (mm) Psilocyn;
198 (nn) Tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a
199 plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), except
200 industrial hemp, as well as synthetic equivalents of the
201 substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the
202 resinous extractives of such plant, or synthetic substances,
203 derivatives and their isomers, or both, with similar
204 chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those
205 substances contained in the plant, such as the following:
206 a. 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
207 optical isomers;
208 b. 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
209 optical isomers;

SB 1724 8
210 c. 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
211 optical isomers;
212 d. Any compounds of these structures, regardless of
213 numerical designation of atomic positions covered;
214 (oo) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine;
215 (pp) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine;
216 (qq) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine;
217 (rr) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine;
218 (ss) Salvia divinorum;
219 (tt) Salvinorin A;
220 (uu) Synthetic cannabinoids:
221 a. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-
222 naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by
223 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by
224 alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
225 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-
226 morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted
227 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
228 in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not
229 limited to:
230 (i) AM2201, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
231 naphthoyl)indole;
232 (ii) JWH-007, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-
233 naphthoyl)indole;
234 (iii) JWH-015, or 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-
235 naphthoyl)indole;
236 (iv) JWH-018, or 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
237 (v) JWH-019, or 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
238 (vi) JWH-073, or 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
239 (vii) JWH-081, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-
240 naphthoyl)indole;

SB 1724 9
241 (viii) JWH-098, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-
242 naphthoyl)indole;
243 (ix) JWH-122, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-
244 naphthoyl)indole;
245 (x) JWH-164, or 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-
246 naphthoyl)indole;
247 (xi) JWH-200, or 1-(2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl))-3-(1-
248 naphthoyl)indole;
249 (xii) JWH-210, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-
250 naphthoyl)indole;
251 (xiii) JWH-398, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-
252 naphthoyl)indole;
253 b. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-
254 naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of
255 the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
256 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
257 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
258 or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any
259 extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to
260 any extent;
261 c. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-
262 naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at the 3-position of
263 the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
264 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
265 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
266 or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent,
267 whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any
268 extent;
269 d. Any compound structurally derived from 3-
270 phenylacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of
271 the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
272 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-

SB 1724 10
273 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
274 or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent,
275 whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any
276 extent. Including, but not limited to:
277 (i) JWH-201, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-
278 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
279 (ii) JWH-203, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
280 chlorophenylacetyl)indole;
281 (iii) JWH-250, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
282 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
283 (iv) JWH-251, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
284 methylphenylacetyl)indole;
285 (v) RCS-8, or 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-
286 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
287 e. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-
288 hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 5-position
289 of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
290 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
291 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
292 or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
293 Including, but not limited to CP 47, 497 and homologues, or
294 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-
295 yl)phenol, where side chain n=5, and homologues where side
296 chain n-4,6, or 7;
297 f. Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
298 structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
299 indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
300 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-
301 morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted
302 in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
303 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including,
304 but not limited to:

SB 1724 11
305 (i) AM-694, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-
306 iodobenzoyl)indole;
307 (ii) RCS-4, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (SR-
308 19 and RCS-4);
309 g. CP 50,556-1, or [(6S,6aR,9R,10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-
310 methyl-3-[(2R)-5-phenylpentan-2-yl] oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-
311 octahydrophenanthridin-1-yl] acetate;
312 h. HU-210, or (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-
313 dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-
314 tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
315 i. HU-211, or Dexanabinol,(6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-
316 6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-
317 tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
318 j. Dimethylheptylpyran, or DMHP;
319 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
320 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
321 depressant effect on the central nervous system, including
322 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the
323 existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is
324 possible within the specific chemical designation:
325 (a) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid;
326 (b) Mecloqualone;
327 (c) Methaqualone;
328 (7) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
329 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
330 stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including
331 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
332 (a) Aminorex;
333 (b) N-benzylpiperazine;
334 (c) Cathinone;
335 (d) Fenethylline;
336 (e) 3-Fluoromethcathinone;

SB 1724 12
337 (f) 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
338 (g) Mephedrone, or 4-methylmethcathinone;
339 (h) Methcathinone;
340 (i) 4-methoxymethcathinone;
341 (j) (+,-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+,-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-
342 methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
343 (k) Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, MDPV, or 1-(1,3-
344 Benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(1-pyrrolidinyl)-1-pentanone;
345 (l) Methylone, or 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone;
346 (m) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, or MPBP;
347 (n) N-ethylamphetamine;
348 (o) N,N-dimethylamphetamine;
349 (p) Quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
350 22; QUPIC);
351 (q) Quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
352 carboxylate (5-fluoro-PB-22; 5F-PB-22);
353 (r) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-
354 fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-FUBINACA);
355 (s) N-(1-amino-3, 3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-
356 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-PINACA);
357 (8) A temporary listing of substances subject to
358 emergency scheduling under federal law shall include any
359 material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains
360 any quantity of the following substances:
361 (a) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-
362 tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical, positional,
363 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
364 (b) [1-(5-fluoro-pentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-
365 tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical, positional,
366 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

SB 1724 13
367 (c) N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-
368 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
369 salts, and salts of isomers;
370 (d) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
371 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
372 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
373 (e) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
374 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
375 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
376 (f) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
377 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
378 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
379 (g) 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone, its optical,
380 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
381 isomers;
382 (h) 4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, its
383 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
384 of isomers;
385 (i) Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, its optical,
386 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
387 isomers;
388 (j) Butylone, its optical, positional, and geometric
389 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
390 (k) Pentedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric
391 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
392 (l) Pentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric
393 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
394 (m) Naphyrone, its optical, positional, and geometric
395 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
396 (n) Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, its optical,
397 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
398 isomers;

SB 1724 14
399 (o) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
400 (cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
401 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
402 isomers;
403 (p) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
404 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
405 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
406 (q) [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-yl](naphthalen-1-
407 yl)methanone, its optical, positional, and geometric
408 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
409 (r) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl) ethyl]piperidin-
410 4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
411 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
412 (s) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide,
413 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and
414 salts of isomers;
415 (t) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
416 (cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
417 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
418 isomers;
419 (u) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
420 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
421 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
422 (v) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
423 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
424 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
425 (w) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-
426 3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric
427 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
428 (x) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-
429 fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,

SB 1724 15
430 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
431 isomers;
432 (y) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
433 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
434 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
435 (z) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
436 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
437 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
438 (aa) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
439 yl)propionamide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
440 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
441 (bb) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
442 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
443 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
444 (cc) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
445 phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
446 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
447 (dd) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
448 phenylpentanamide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
449 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
450 (ee) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
451 yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts
452 of isomers, esters, and ethers;
453 (ff) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
454 yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts
455 of isomers, esters, and ethers;
456 (gg) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
457 yl)isobutyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
458 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
459 (hh) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
460 phenylisobutyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
461 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;

SB 1724 16
462 (ii) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
463 phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
464 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
465 (jj) Fentanyl-related substances, their isomers,
466 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and
467 ethers. Fentanyl-related substance shall mean any substance
468 not otherwise listed under another Drug Enforcement
469 Administration Controlled Substance Code Number, and for
470 which no exemption or approval is in effect under section
471 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
472 Section 355, that is structurally related to fentanyl by one
473 or more of the following modifications:
474 a. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl
475 group by any monocycle, whether or not further substituted
476 in or on the monocycle;
477 b. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with
478 alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or
479 nitro groups;
480 c. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with
481 alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, amino or
482 nitro groups;
483 d. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic
484 monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the
485 aromatic monocycle; or
486 e. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another
487 acyl group;
488 (kk) Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
489 carboxylate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
490 salts, and salts of isomers (NM2201; CBL2201);
491 (ll) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
492 fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,

SB 1724 17
493 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
494 isomers (5F-AB-PINACA);
495 (mm) 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
496 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
497 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (4-CN-CUMYL-
498 BUTINACA; 4-cyano-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-CN-CUMYLBINACA; CUMYL-
499 4CN-BINACA; SGT-78);
500 (nn) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
501 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
502 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (MMB-CHMICA,
503 AMB-CHMICA);
504 (oo) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
505 pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide, its optical,
506 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
507 isomers (5F-CUMYL-P7AICA);
508 (pp) N-ethylpentylone, its optical, positional, and
509 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (ephylone, 1-
510 (1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one;
511 (qq) ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
512 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
513 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
514 name: 5F-EDMB-PINACA);
515 (rr) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
516 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
517 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
518 name: 5F-MDMB-PICA);
519 (ss) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-
520 3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric
521 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: FUB-
522 AKB48; FUB-APINACA; AKB48 N-(4-FLUOROBENZYL));
523 (tt) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
524 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and

SB 1724 18
525 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
526 names: 5F-CUMYL-PINACA; SGT-25);
527 (uu) (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-
528 tetramethylcyclopropyl) methanone, its optical, positional,
529 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
530 name: FUB-144);
531 (vv) N-ethylhexedrone, its optical, positional, and
532 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other name:
533 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);
534 (ww) alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, its optical,
535 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
536 isomers (Other names: α-PHP; alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone;
537 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
538 (xx) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, its
539 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
540 of isomers; (Other names: 4-MEAP; 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-
541 methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);
542 (yy) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, its
543 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
544 of isomers (Other names: MPHP; 4'-methyl-alpha-
545 pyrrolidinohexanophenone; 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
546 yl)hexan-1-one);
547 (zz) alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone, its optical,
548 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
549 isomers (Other names: PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
550 yl)heptan-1-one);
551 (aaa) 4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, its
552 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
553 of isomers (Other names: 4-chloro-α-PVP; 4'-chloro-alpha-
554 pyrrolidinopentiophenone; 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
555 yl)pentan-1-one);

SB 1724 19
556 (9) Khat, to include all parts of the plant presently
557 classified botanically as catha edulis, whether growing or
558 not; the seeds thereof; any extract from any part of such
559 plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
560 mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seed or extracts.
561 3. The department of health and senior services shall
562 place a substance in Schedule II if it finds that:
563 (1) The substance has high potential for abuse;
564 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
565 in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted
566 medical use with severe restrictions; and
567 (3) The abuse of the substance may lead to severe
568 psychic or physical dependence.
569 4. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
570 are included in Schedule II:
571 (1) Any of the following substances whether produced
572 directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
573 vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
574 synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical
575 synthesis:
576 (a) Opium and opiate; and any salt, compound,
577 derivative or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding
578 apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan,
579 nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone, and naltrexone,
580 and their respective salts, but including the following:
581 a. Raw opium;
582 b. Opium extracts;
583 c. Opium fluid;
584 d. Powdered opium;
585 e. Granulated opium;
586 f. Tincture of opium;
587 g. Codeine;

SB 1724 20
588 h. Dihydroetorphine;
589 i. Ethylmorphine;
590 j. Etorphine hydrochloride;
591 k. Hydrocodone;
592 l. Hydromorphone;
593 m. Metopon;
594 n. Morphine;
595 o. Oripavine;
596 p. Oxycodone;
597 q. Oxymorphone;
598 r. Thebaine;
599 (b) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
600 thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any
601 of the substances referred to in this subdivision, but not
602 including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
603 (c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
604 (d) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or
605 preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound,
606 derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
607 equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but
608 not including the following:
609 a. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca
610 leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine or
611 ecgonine; or
612 b. Ioflupane;
613 (e) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of
614 poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which
615 contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy);
616 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their
617 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
618 whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and

SB 1724 21
619 salts is possible within the specific chemical designation,
620 dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted:
621 (a) Alfentanil;
622 (b) Alphaprodine;
623 (c) Anileridine;
624 (d) Bezitramide;
625 (e) Bulk dextropropoxyphene;
626 (f) Carfentanil;
627 (g) Dihydrocodeine;
628 (h) Diphenoxylate;
629 (i) Fentanyl;
630 (j) Isomethadone;
631 (k) Levo-alphacetylmethadol;
632 (l) Levomethorphan;
633 (m) Levorphanol;
634 (n) Metazocine;
635 (o) Methadone;
636 (p) Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,
637 4-diphenylbutane;
638 (q) Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-
639 diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid;
640 (r) Pethidine (meperidine);
641 (s) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-
642 phenylpiperidine;
643 (t) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-
644 4-carboxylate;
645 (u) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-
646 phenylpiperdine-4-carboxylic acid;
647 (v) Phenazocine;
648 (w) Piminodine;
649 (x) Racemethorphan;
650 (y) Racemorphan;

SB 1724 22
651 (z) Remifentanil;
652 (aa) Sufentanil;
653 (bb) Tapentadol;
654 (cc) Thiafentanil;
655 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
656 which contains any quantity of the following substances
657 having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
658 (a) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts
659 of its optical isomers;
660 (b) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of
661 its isomers;
662 (c) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of
663 its isomers;
664 (d) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
665 (e) Methylphenidate;
666 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
667 which contains any quantity of the following substances
668 having a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
669 including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever
670 the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
671 is possible within the specific chemical designation:
672 (a) Amobarbital;
673 (b) Glutethimide;
674 (c) Pentobarbital;
675 (d) Phencyclidine;
676 (e) Secobarbital;
677 (5) Hallucinogenic substances:
678 (a) Any material or compound which contains any
679 quantity of nabilone;
680 (b) Dronabinol [(-)-Δ-9-trans tetrahydrocannabinol] in
681 an oral solution in a drug product approved for marketing by
682 the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;

SB 1724 23
683 (6) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
684 which contains any quantity of the following substances:
685 (a) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and
686 methamphetamine: Phenylacetone;
687 (b) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
688 a. 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
689 b. 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC);
690 (c) Immediate precursor to fentanyl: 4-anilino-N-
691 phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP);
692 (7) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
693 which contains any quantity of the following alkyl nitrites:
694 (a) Amyl nitrite;
695 (b) Butyl nitrite.
696 5. The department of health and senior services shall
697 place a substance in Schedule III if it finds that:
698 (1) The substance has a potential for abuse less than
699 the substances listed in Schedules I and II;
700 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
701 in treatment in the United States; and
702 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low
703 physical dependence or high psychological dependence.
704 6. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
705 are included in Schedule III:
706 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
707 which contains any quantity of the following substances
708 having a potential for abuse associated with a stimulant
709 effect on the central nervous system:
710 (a) Benzphetamine;
711 (b) Chlorphentermine;
712 (c) Clortermine;
713 (d) Phendimetrazine;

SB 1724 24
714 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
715 which contains any quantity or salt of the following
716 substances or salts having a depressant effect on the
717 central nervous system:
718 (a) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
719 which contains any quantity or salt of the following
720 substances combined with one or more active medicinal
721 ingredients:
722 a. Amobarbital;
723 b. Secobarbital;
724 c. Pentobarbital;
725 (b) Any suppository dosage form containing any
726 quantity or salt of the following:
727 a. Amobarbital;
728 b. Secobarbital;
729 c. Pentobarbital;
730 (c) Any substance which contains any quantity of a
731 derivative of barbituric acid or its salt;
732 (d) Chlorhexadol;
733 (e) Embutramide;
734 (f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid and its salts, isomers,
735 and salts of isomers contained in a drug product for which
736 an application has been approved under Section 505 of the
737 federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
738 (g) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
739 (h) Lysergic acid;
740 (i) Lysergic acid amide;
741 (j) Methyprylon;
742 (k) Perampanel, and its salts, isomers, and salts of
743 isomers;
744 (l) Sulfondiethylmethane;
745 (m) Sulfonethylmethane;

SB 1724 25
746 (n) Sulfonmethane;
747 (o) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof;
748 (3) Nalorphine;
749 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
750 containing limited quantities of any of the following
751 narcotic drugs or their salts:
752 (a) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred
753 milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage
754 unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline
755 alkaloid of opium;
756 (b) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred
757 milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage
758 unit with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in
759 recognized therapeutic amounts;
760 (c) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per one
761 hundred milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per
762 dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic
763 ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
764 (d) Not more than three hundred milligrams of
765 ethylmorphine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
766 fifteen milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,
767 nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
768 (e) Not more than five hundred milligrams of opium per
769 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams or not more
770 than twenty-five milligrams per dosage unit, with one or
771 more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
772 therapeutic amounts;
773 (f) Not more than fifty milligrams of morphine per one
774 hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams, with one or
775 more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
776 therapeutic amounts;

SB 1724 26
777 (5) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
778 containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their
779 salts: Buprenorphine;
780 (6) Anabolic steroids. Any drug or hormonal
781 substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to
782 testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins,
783 corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone) that promotes
784 muscle growth, except an anabolic steroid which is expressly
785 intended for administration through implants to cattle or
786 other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the
787 Secretary of Health and Human Services for that
788 administration. If any person prescribes, dispenses, or
789 distributes such steroid for human use, such person shall be
790 considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an
791 anabolic steroid within the meaning of this subdivision.
792 Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
793 schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation
794 containing any quantity of the following substances,
795 including its salts, esters and ethers:
796 (a) 3ß,17ß-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
797 (b) 3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
798 (c) 5α-androstan-3,17-dione;
799 (d) 1-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-
800 ene);
801 (e) 1-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-
802 ene);
803 (f) 4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);
804 (g) 5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
805 (h) 1-androstenedione ([5α]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
806 (i) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
807 (j) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);

SB 1724 27
808 (k) Bolasterone (7α, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-
809 en-3-one);
810 (l) Boldenone (17β-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);
811 (m) Boldione;
812 (n) Calusterone (7β, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-
813 en-3-one);
814 (o) Clostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
815 (p) Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17β-
816 hydroxy-17α-methyl-androst-1,4-dien-3-one);
817 (q) Desoxymethyltestosterone;
818 (r) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17ß-hydroxy-androstan-3-
819 one);
820 (s) Drostanolone (17ß-hydroxy-2α-methyl-5α-androstan-3-
821 one);
822 (t) Ethylestrenol (17α-ethyl-17ß-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
823 (u) Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17α-methyl-11ß,17ß-
824 dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
825 (v) Formebolone (2-formyl-17α-methyl-11α,17ß-
826 dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
827 (w) Furazabol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-
828 furazan);
829 (x) 13ß-ethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
830 (y) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-androst-4-
831 en-3-one);
832 (z) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-estr-
833 4-en-3-one);
834 (aa) Mestanolone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androstan-
835 3-one);
836 (bb) Mesterolone (1α- methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-
837 androstan-3-one);
838 (cc) Methandienone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrost-1,4-
839 dien-3-one);

SB 1724 28
840 (dd) Methandriol (17α-methyl-3ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-5-
841 ene);
842 (ee) Methasterone (2α,17α-dimethyl-5α-androstan-17β-ol-
843 3-one);
844 (ff) Methenolone (1-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-
845 3-one);
846 (gg) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
847 (hh) 17α-methyl-3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
848 (ii) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
849 (jj) 17α-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17α-methyl-4-
850 hydroxy-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
851 (kk) Methyldienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-
852 4,9(10)-dien-3-one);
853 (ll) Methyltrienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-
854 4,9,11-trien-3-one);
855 (mm) Methyltestosterone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-
856 4-en-3-one);
857 (nn) Mibolerone (7α,17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-
858 3-one);
859 (oo) 17α-methyl-Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (17β-hydroxy-
860 17α-methyl-5α-androst-1-en-3-one) (a.k.a. '17-α-methyl-1-
861 testosterone');
862 (pp) Nandrolone (17β-hydroxyestr-4-ene-3-one);
863 (qq) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-
864 ene);
865 (rr) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-
866 ene);
867 (ss) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-
868 diene-3,17-dione);
869 (tt) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-
870 ene);

SB 1724 29
871 (uu) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-
872 ene);
873 (vv) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
874 (ww) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
875 (xx) Norbolethone (13β,17α-diethyl-17β-hydroxygon-4-en-
876 3-one);
877 (yy) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
878 one);
879 (zz) Norethandrolone (17α-ethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
880 one);
881 (aaa) Normethandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-
882 en-3-one);
883 (bbb) Oxandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5α]-
884 androstan-3-one);
885 (ccc) Oxymesterone (17α-methyl-4,17β-dihydroxyandrost-
886 4-en-3-one);
887 (ddd) metholone (17α-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17β-
888 hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
889 (eee) Prostanozol (17β-hydroxy-5α-androstano[3,2-
890 c]pyrazole);
891 (fff) Stanolone (Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a. 1-
892 testosterone)(17β-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-3-one));
893 (ggg) Stanozolol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androst-
894 2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
895 (hhh) Stenbolone (17ß-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5α]-androst-1-
896 en-3-one);
897 (iii) Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-
898 secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone);
899 (jjj) Testosterone (17ß-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
900 (kkk) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13ß,17α-diethyl-17ß-
901 hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
902 (lll) Trenbolone (17ß-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

SB 1724 30
903 (mmm) Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance
904 described or listed in this subdivision, except an anabolic
905 steroid which is expressly intended for administration
906 through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and
907 which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human
908 Services for that administration;
909 (7) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and
910 encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States
911 Food and Drug Administration approved drug product;
912 (8) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
913 that contains xylazine, except in the following cases:
914 (a) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering to an
915 animal a drug containing xylazine that has been approved by
916 the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
917 under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b;
918 (b) Dispensing, prescribing, or administering xylazine
919 to an animal that is permissible under 21 U.S.C. Section
920 360b(a)(4);
921 (c) Manufacturing, distributing, or using xylazine as
922 an active pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an
923 animal drug:
924 a. Approved under 21 U.S.C. Section 360b; or
925 b. Issued an investigation use exemption under 21
926 U.S.C. Section 360b(j);
927 (d) Manufacturing, distributing, or using a xylazine
928 bulk chemical for pharmaceutical compounding by a licensed
929 pharmacist or veterinarian; or
930 (e) Any other use approved or permissible under 21
931 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.;
932 (9) The department of health and senior services may
933 except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation
934 containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in

SB 1724 31
935 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection from the
936 application of all or any part of sections 195.010 to
937 195.320 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains
938 one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a
939 stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
940 system, and if the admixtures are included therein in
941 combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
942 vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have
943 a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
944 system.
945 7. The department of health and senior services shall
946 place a substance in Schedule IV if it finds that:
947 (1) The substance has a low potential for abuse
948 relative to substances in Schedule III;
949 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
950 in treatment in the United States; and
951 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to limited
952 physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to
953 the substances in Schedule III.
954 8. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
955 are included in Schedule IV:
956 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
957 containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their
958 salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in
959 limited quantities as set forth below:
960 (a) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not
961 less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per
962 dosage unit;
963 (b) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-
964 diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane);

SB 1724 32
965 (c) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-
966 methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and geometric
967 isomers, and salts of these isomers (including tramadol);
968 (d) Any of the following limited quantities of
969 narcotic drugs or their salts, which shall include one or
970 more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient
971 proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or
972 preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those
973 possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
974 a. Not more than two hundred milligrams of codeine per
975 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
976 b. Not more than one hundred milligrams of
977 dihydrocodeine per one hundred milliliters or per one
978 hundred grams;
979 c. Not more than one hundred milligrams of
980 ethylmorphine per one hundred milliliters or per one hundred
981 grams;
982 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
983 containing any quantity of the following substances,
984 including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
985 whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of
986 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
987 (a) Alfaxalone;
988 (b) Alprazolam;
989 (c) Barbital;
990 (d) Bromazepam;
991 (e) Camazepam;
992 (f) Carisoprodol;
993 (g) Chloral betaine;
994 (h) Chloral hydrate;
995 (i) Chlordiazepoxide;
996 (j) Clobazam;

SB 1724 33
997 (k) Clonazepam;
998 (l) Clorazepate;
999 (m) Clotiazepam;
1000 (n) Cloxazolam;
1001 (o) Delorazepam;
1002 (p) Diazepam;
1003 (q) Dichloralphenazone;
1004 (r) Estazolam;
1005 (s) Ethchlorvynol;
1006 (t) Ethinamate;
1007 (u) Ethyl loflazepate;
1008 (v) Fludiazepam;
1009 (w) Flunitrazepam;
1010 (x) Flurazepam;
1011 (y) Fospropofol;
1012 (z) Halazepam;
1013 (aa) Haloxazolam;
1014 (bb) Ketazolam;
1015 (cc) Loprazolam;
1016 (dd) Lorazepam;
1017 (ee) Lormetazepam;
1018 (ff) Mebutamate;
1019 (gg) Medazepam;
1020 (hh) Meprobamate;
1021 (ii) Methohexital;
1022 (jj) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
1023 (kk) Midazolam;
1024 (ll) Nimetazepam;
1025 (mm) Nitrazepam;
1026 (nn) Nordiazepam;
1027 (oo) Oxazepam;
1028 (pp) Oxazolam;

SB 1724 34
1029 (qq) Paraldehyde;
1030 (rr) Petrichloral;
1031 (ss) Phenobarbital;
1032 (tt) Pinazepam;
1033 (uu) Prazepam;
1034 (vv) Quazepam;
1035 (ww) Suvorexant;
1036 (xx) Temazepam;
1037 (yy) Tetrazepam;
1038 (zz) Triazolam;
1039 (aaa) Zaleplon;
1040 (bbb) Zolpidem;
1041 (ccc) Zopiclone;
1042 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
1043 which contains any quantity of the following substance
1044 including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever
1045 the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is
1046 possible: fenfluramine;
1047 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
1048 which contains any quantity of the following substances,
1049 including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever
1050 the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
1051 is possible: Lorcaserin;
1052 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1053 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
1054 stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including
1055 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
1056 (a) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
1057 (b) Diethylpropion;
1058 (c) Fencamfamin;
1059 (d) Fenproporex;
1060 (e) Mazindol;

SB 1724 35
1061 (f) Mefenorex;
1062 (g) Modafinil;
1063 (h) Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and
1064 chelates thereof;
1065 (i) Phentermine;
1066 (j) Pipradrol;
1067 (k) Sibutramine;
1068 (l) SPA ((-)-1-dimethyamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
1069 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1070 containing any quantity of the following substance,
1071 including its salts:
1072 (a) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);
1073 (b) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-
1074 2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1 H-
1075 imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid)
1076 (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and
1077 salts of isomers;
1078 (c) Pentazocine;
1079 (7) Ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of
1080 optical isomers, when the substance is the only active
1081 medicinal ingredient;
1082 (8) The department of health and senior services may
1083 except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation
1084 containing any depressant substance listed in subdivision
1085 (1) of this subsection from the application of all or any
1086 part of sections 195.010 to 195.320 and sections 579.015 to
1087 579.086 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains
1088 one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a
1089 depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
1090 admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity,
1091 proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for

SB 1724 36
1092 abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on
1093 the central nervous system.
1094 9. The department of health and senior services shall
1095 place a substance in Schedule V if it finds that:
1096 (1) The substance has low potential for abuse relative
1097 to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV;
1098 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
1099 in treatment in the United States; and
1100 (3) The substance has limited physical dependence or
1101 psychological dependence liability relative to the
1102 controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.
1103 10. The controlled substances listed in this
1104 subsection are included in Schedule V:
1105 (1) Any compound, mixture or preparation containing
1106 any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts
1107 calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in
1108 limited quantities as set forth below, which also contains
1109 one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in
1110 sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture
1111 or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those
1112 possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
1113 (a) Not more than two and five-tenths milligrams of
1114 diphenoxylate and not less than twenty-five micrograms of
1115 atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
1116 (b) Not more than one hundred milligrams of opium per
1117 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
1118 (c) Not more than five-tenths milligram of difenoxin
1119 and not less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate
1120 per dosage unit;
1121 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1122 which contains any quantity of the following substance
1123 having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system

SB 1724 37
1124 including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
1125 pyrovalerone;
1126 (3) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
1127 any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine or its salts or
1128 optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or any
1129 compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
1130 quantity of ephedrine or its salts or optical isomers, or
1131 salts of optical isomers;
1132 (4) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless
1133 listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
1134 or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
1135 substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous
1136 system, including its salts:
1137 (a) Brivaracetam ((25)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-
1138 propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also referred to as BRV;
1139 UCB-34714; Briviact);
1140 (b) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4(4-fluorobenzylamino)-
1141 phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester];
1142 (c) Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-
1143 propionamide];
1144 (d) Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic
1145 acid];
1146 (5) Any drug product in finished dosage formulation
1147 that has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
1148 Administration that contains cannabidiol (2-[1R-3-methyl-6R-
1149 (1-methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-1,3-
1150 benzenediol) derived from cannabis and no more than 0.1
1151 percent (w/w) residual tetrahydro cannabinols.
1152 11. If any compound, mixture, or preparation as
1153 specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
1154 section is dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy
1155 without a prescription:

SB 1724 38
1156 (1) All packages of any compound, mixture, or
1157 preparation containing any detectable quantity of
1158 pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of
1159 optical isomers or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers,
1160 or salts of optical isomers, shall be offered for sale only
1161 from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not
1162 permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
1163 pharmacy technician; and
1164 (2) Any person purchasing, receiving or otherwise
1165 acquiring any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
1166 any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or
1167 optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or ephedrine,
1168 its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers
1169 shall be at least eighteen years of age; and
1170 (3) The pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
1171 pharmacy technician shall require any person, prior to such
1172 person's purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring such
1173 compound, mixture, or preparation to furnish suitable photo
1174 identification that is issued by a state or the federal
1175 government or a document that, with respect to
1176 identification, is considered acceptable and showing the
1177 date of birth of the person;
1178 (4) The seller shall deliver the product directly into
1179 the custody of the purchaser.
1180 12. Pharmacists, intern pharmacists, and registered
1181 pharmacy technicians shall implement and maintain an
1182 electronic log of each transaction. Such log shall include
1183 the following information:
1184 (1) The name, address, and signature of the purchaser;
1185 (2) The amount of the compound, mixture, or
1186 preparation purchased;
1187 (3) The date and time of each purchase; and

SB 1724 39
1188 (4) The name or initials of the pharmacist, intern
1189 pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician who dispensed
1190 the compound, mixture, or preparation to the purchaser.
1191 13. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
1192 sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
1193 in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section in
1194 accordance with transmission methods and frequency
1195 established by the department by regulation;
1196 14. No person shall dispense, sell, purchase, receive,
1197 or otherwise acquire quantities greater than those specified
1198 in this chapter.
1199 15. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
1200 pseudoephedrine and ephedrine products in a pharmacy shall
1201 ensure that all such products are located only behind a
1202 pharmacy counter where the public is not permitted.
1203 16. The penalties for a knowing or reckless violation
1204 of the provisions of subsections 11 to 15 of this section
1205 are found in section 579.060.
1206 17. The scheduling of substances specified in
1207 subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section and
1208 subsections 11, 12, 14, and 15 of this section shall not
1209 apply to any compounds, mixtures, or preparations that are
1210 in liquid or liquid-filled gel capsule form or to any
1211 compound, mixture, or preparation specified in subdivision
1212 (3) of subsection 10 of this section which must be
1213 dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy pursuant to a
1214 prescription.
1215 18. The manufacturer of a drug product or another
1216 interested party may apply with the department of health and
1217 senior services for an exemption from this section. The
1218 department of health and senior services may grant an
1219 exemption by rule from this section if the department finds

SB 1724 40
1220 the drug product is not used in the illegal manufacture of
1221 methamphetamine or other controlled or dangerous
1222 substances. The department of health and senior services
1223 shall rely on reports from law enforcement and law
1224 enforcement evidentiary laboratories in determining if the
1225 proposed product can be used to manufacture illicit
1226 controlled substances.
1227 19. The department of health and senior services shall
1228 revise and republish the schedules annually.
1229 20. The department of health and senior services shall
1230 promulgate rules under chapter 536 regarding the security
1231 and storage of Schedule V controlled substances, as
1232 described in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
1233 section, for distributors as registered by the department of
1234 health and senior services.
1235 21. Logs of transactions required to be kept and
1236 maintained by this section and section 195.417 shall create
1237 a rebuttable presumption that the person whose name appears
1238 in the logs is the person whose transactions are recorded in
1239 the logs.
✓